Alabama, session 2026rs, HB590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 28-12-6 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§28-12-6
(a) Notwithstanding Sections 28-12-44 and 28-12-45 and
any other provision of this chapter that prohibits the sale of
a consumable hemp product without a license issued by the
board, a pharmacy located in this state that holds a valid
permit issued by the Alabama Board of Pharmacy may sell at
retail consumable hemp products without obtaining a license
from, or being subject to oversight by the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Board, provided the pharmacy complies with all of the
following:
(1) All consumable hemp products must be sold by a
licensed pharmacist or by a pharmacy technician or employee
who is under the direct supervision and control of a licensed
pharmacist.
(2) Consumable hemp products may only be sold to
individuals 21 years of age or older and the sale must be in
compliance with Section 28-12-48.
Page 2

compliance with Section 28-12-48.
HB590 INTRODUCED
(3) All consumable hemp products sold or offered for
sale in a pharmacy must be in compliance with Article 2.
(b) The Alabama Board of Pharmacy shall enforce this
section and may adopt rules to implement this section.
Section 2. Section 28-12-45, Code of Alabama 1975,
added by Act 2025-385 of the 2025 Regular Session, is amended
to read as follows:
"§28-12-45
(a) Other than pharmacies selling topical or sublingual
consumable hemp products pursuant to subsection (b) Section
28-12-6 and retail food stores selling beverage consumable
hemp products pursuant to subsection (c)(b), all retailer
establishments must be restricted so that only those
individuals 21 years of age or older are permitted to enter
and the establishment has its own dedicated public entrance.
Except as provided in subsection (b) and (c), the board shall
only issue retailer licenses to persons:
(1) That have a valid retail liquor license from the
board which authorizes off-premises consumption only; or
(2) That only sell consumable hemp products.
(b) Topical and sublingual consumable hemp products may
be sold in a pharmacy licensed by the Alabama State Board of
Pharmacy, provided the pharmacy obtains a consumable hemp
product retailer license from the Alcoholic Beverage Control
Board and complies with this chapter and rules of the board.
Any topical consumable hemp product sold in a pharmacy must be
sold by a licensed pharmacist or by a pharmacy technician or
employee who is under the direct supervision and control of a
Page 3

employee who is under the direct supervision and control of a
HB590 INTRODUCED
licensed pharmacist. This subsection does not prohibit a
retailer described in subsection (a) from selling topical or
sublingual consumable hemp products in that retailer's
licensed premises.
(c)(b)(1) Consumable hemp products that are beverages
may be sold in a retail food store, provided the retail food
store obtains a consumable hemp product retailer license from
the board and complies with this chapter and rules of the
board. Consumable hemp product beverages sold in a retail food
store must be kept in an area that is: (i) separated from
nonalcoholic beverages or beverages intended for children;
(ii) behind glass; and (iii) demarcated by a sign indicating
that the beverages contain hemp-derived compounds. This
subsection does not prohibit a retailer described in
subsection (a) from selling consumable hemp product beverages
100 in that retailer's licensed premises.
101 (2) For purposes of this subsection, "retail food
102 store" means any store commonly known as a supermarket, food
103 store, or grocery store, primarily engaged in the retail sale
104 of a variety of canned goods, frozen foods, nonalcoholic
105 beverages, dry goods, either packaged or in bulk, and fresh
106 produce or meats, and the store dedicates: (i) a minimum of 75
107 percent of the store's selling area to the sale of food items
108 listed in this subdivision; and (ii) at least 14,000 square
109 feet of the store's footprint to the sale of food items listed
110 in this subdivision.
111 (d)(c)(1) A retailer described in subsection (a) shall
112 maintain at its licensed premises a minimum of 500 square feet
Page 4

maintain at its licensed premises a minimum of 500 square feet
HB590 INTRODUCED
113 of sales and service area. A retailer may not include in the
114 calculation of sales and service area any areas that are not
115 open to customers or not used for sales or displaying
116 consumable hemp products, such as office space or storage.
117 (2) A retailer must have an employee present in the
118 sales and service area of the licensed premises at all times
119 the premises is open to customers.
120 (3) The purchase of all consumable hemp products must
121 take place in the licensed premises.
122 (e)(d) A retailer shall display the retailer license in
123 the licensed premises in a conspicuous manner."
124 Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
125 2026.
Page 5